Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 3. Enforcement.

Sec. 41.17.120.
Inspections and investigations.

The commissioner may inspect and investigate forest land and activities on it and may enter upon it in conjunction with any operations as necessary to ensure compliance with applicable regulations and requirements and to otherwise enforce the provisions of this chapter. Other state agencies have this same authority to the extent necessary to enforce their own laws and regulations on forest land. Those agencies and the commissioner shall coordinate their actions under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 107, § 31 (2003); am E.O. No. 114 § 29 (2008))

Administrative Code. —

For introductory and notification provisions, see 11 AAC 95, art. 1.

Sec. 41.17.125.
Enforcement coordination.

All state agencies with enforcement authority over an activity subject to regulation under this chapter shall establish a uniform enforcement strategy that avoids duplication and inconsistencies.
All participating agencies shall agree to and comply with the contents of the uniform strategy. In developing and implementing the uniform strategy, each state agency retains its authority to determine the appropriate remedies under the statutes and regulations it administers.

History.

(§ 15 ch 34 SLA 1990)

Sec. 41.17.131.
Penalties for violations.

An operator, forest landowner, or timber owner who violates or permits a violation of this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, a directive issued under AS

41.17.136

, or a stop work order issued under AS

41.17.138

is liable, after notice and hearing, for a civil fine in an amount not to exceed $10,000 to be assessed by the commissioner. In determining the amount of civil fine, the commissioner shall consider

the character and degree of injury to forest resources and values;

the degree of intent or negligence of the respondent in causing or permitting the violation;

the character and number of past violations caused or permitted by the respondent; and

if the information is available, the net economic savings realized by the respondent through the violation.

An operator, forest landowner, or timber owner that, with criminal negligence, violates or permits a violation of this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, a directive issued under AS

41.17.136

, or a stop work order issued under AS

41.17.138

is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. In this subsection, “criminal negligence” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

.

Each day that a violation described in this section occurs is a separate violation.

If a respondent violates a directive issued under AS

41.17.136

or a stop work order issued under AS

41.17.138

, the attorney general, at the request of the commissioner, may seek an injunction requiring the respondent to suspend all or part of the operations until the respondent complies with the directive or stop work order, and requiring the respondent to repair or correct damage resulting from the violation.

If a respondent violates a directive issued under AS

41.17.136

that requires the respondent to repair or correct damage, the commissioner may proceed to repair or correct the damage using state agency employees or contractors and the respondent is liable for the cost of the repair. The commissioner shall deliver to the respondent an itemized statement of expenses incurred.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am § 16 ch 34 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.17.130(a). Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Secs. 41.17.133,
41.17.135.
Notice and hearing; final orders; civil fines. [Repealed, § 33 ch 34 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 41.17.136.
Directives.

Upon a determination that a planned or ongoing activity violates or would violate this chapter or a regulation adopted under it, the state forester shall notify the respondent in writing and direct the respondent to halt or avoid the violation or to repair or correct any damage resulting from the violation. The written notification must include a summary of the basis for the directive.

The respondent may either comply with the directive or request a hearing under AS

41.17.139

within 15 days of receipt of the notification. If a hearing is requested, the respondent may continue with the activity unless the state forester issues a stop work order under AS

41.17.138

. If the directive is affirmed by the hearing officer, the respondent shall cease the activity unless a stay is issued under AS

41.17.143(c)

or by the superior court.

History.

(§ 17 ch 34 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For introductory and notification provisions, see 11 AAC 95, art. 1.

Sec. 41.17.137.
Temporary orders. [Repealed, § 33 ch 34 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 41.17.138.
Stop work orders.

Upon a determination that a violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under it is occurring or is likely to occur and that significant harm to public resources is likely to occur if work is not halted before a hearing can be held, the state forester may issue a stop work order requiring the respondent to stop the violation or otherwise halt the threatened harm. A stop work order must be in writing and must state the facts on which it is based.

The state forester shall immediately refer the matter to a hearing officer for determination of the validity of the stop work order under AS

41.17.139

. The hearing officer shall consider any arguments and evidence presented by the respondent within five workdays after receipt of the stop work order and shall then make an immediate decision sustaining or reversing the stop work order. The stop work order is of no further effect if it is not sustained by the hearing officer within the five-workday period. A stop work order may be sustained only upon the same grounds on which it was originally issued.

History.

(§ 18 ch 34 SLA 1990)

Sec. 41.17.139.
Hearing procedures.

Unless otherwise specified, proceedings under AS

41.17.131

—

41.17.139

are not subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). A hearing under AS

41.17.136

or

41.17.138

shall be held before the state forester, a regional forester, or another employee of the division with similar qualifications acting as a hearing officer. A hearing on an appeal under AS

41.17.087

and a hearing under AS

41.17.082(b)

shall be held before the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee. A person who has assisted in the preparation of the division’s case is ineligible. Hearings are not limited by common law, statutory, or judicial rules of evidence; however, the hearing officer may admit only that evidence that appears to be reliable and trustworthy. All hearings shall be open to the public. Written or oral testimony may be submitted. A party to a hearing may make written or oral argument, secure the issuance of a subpoena under AS

44.62.430

, offer testimony or other evidence, and cross-examine witnesses. The hearing officer shall endeavor, in conducting any hearing, to ensure that the respondent understands the proceedings and that the facts supporting the position of each party have been adequately presented.

If the respondent notifies the commissioner within five days before the hearing provided for in (a) of this section, the following rules and procedures apply to the hearing:

the hearing shall be a nonadversary proceeding, with the hearing officer fully and impartially representing the interests of the state and the respondent;

the hearing officer shall thoroughly investigate the facts and circumstances relating to the alleged violation, including taking testimony from appropriate persons, collecting and examining documents and other evidence, and performing other actions consistent with due process of law; and

the hearing officer shall issue a decision in accordance with the applicable procedures of (a) of this section.

The hearing officer shall select the location of the hearing, giving consideration to the convenience of the parties and witnesses. The hearing officer may permit witnesses to testify through teleconferencing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am §§ 19, 20 ch 34 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.17.130(h). Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For introductory and notification provisions, see 11 AAC 95, art. 1.

Sec. 41.17.141.
Enforcement of orders. [Repealed, § 33 ch 34 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 41.17.143.
Appeals and judicial review.

A decision by a hearing officer under AS

41.17.136

or

41.17.138

or by the commissioner under AS

41.17.082(b)

,

41.17.087

, or

41.17.131(a)

constitutes final agency action that may be appealed to the superior court within 30 days after it is issued. Judicial review shall be as provided in AS

44.62.560

and

44.62.570

.

An operator, forest landowner, or timber owner may request the commissioner to reconsider the decision of a hearing officer within 30 days after it is issued. Reconsideration is not a precondition of judicial review under (a) of this section. If reconsideration is requested, the final agency action for purposes of judicial review is a decision by the commissioner to affirm, modify, or reverse the hearing officer or to deny the request for reconsideration.

The commissioner may stay or modify a directive or order pending administrative or judicial review. A stay or modification may not be appealed separately from an appeal of the substantive decision.

A person, except the aggrieved forest landowner, timber owner, or operator, may not maintain an administrative or judicial appeal, or other action or proceeding of any kind, challenging a decision or failure to act by the department with respect to the compliance of a timber operation on private forest land with this chapter or a regulation, standard, directive, or order issued under this chapter. This subsection does not prohibit the maintenance of an action

for an alleged violation of a constitutional right; or

against the department regarding a regulation, standard, or systematic course of conduct that does not involve a challenge to, or attempt to enjoin, stay, modify, or otherwise affect a timber operation on private forest land subject to this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1978; am § 21 ch 34 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.17.140. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For introductory and notification provisions, see 11 AAC 95, art. 1.